Tennessee, session 114, SB2175.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-221-1205(c), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(4) Are located in a rural county. As used in this subsection (c), "rural county"
means a county having a population of less than fifty-seven thousand (57,000),
according to the 2020 or a subsequent federal census.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2175
010199
- 1 -